Alabama, session 2026rs, HB497.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
40 Section 1. (a) For the purposes of this section, the
41 following terms have the following meanings:
42 (1) ADMH. The Alabama Department of Mental Health.
43 (2) CRITICAL INCIDENT. An occurrence or event, severe
44 in nature, scope, and potential consequences, involving a
45 recipient that warrants immediate action.
46 (3) ELECTRONIC MANAGEMENT SYSTEM. A web-based system
47 used to identify, report, investigate, resolve, track, and
48 trend critical incidents.
49 (4) ELOPEMENT. Occurs when a recipient cannot be
50 located and there is reason to believe the recipient may be
51 lost or in danger.
52 (5) EXPLOITATION. The expenditure, diminution, or use
53 of the property, assets, or resources of recipients subject to
54 protection under the Chapter 9 of Title 38, Code of Alabama
55 1975, without the express voluntary consent of that recipient
56 or legally authorized representative. The term includes, but
Page 2

or legally authorized representative. The term includes, but
HB497 INTRODUCED
57 is not limited to, improperly requesting a recipient to
58 perform an employee's work responsibilities, services, or
59 tasks for the employee; requesting, taking, or receiving
60 money, gifts, or other personal possessions from a recipient;
61 or utilizing a recipient to engage in conduct with other
62 recipients which would be prohibited if performed by an
63 employee.
64 (6) LAW ENFORCEMENT INVOLVEMENT. Any situation where
65 law enforcement is called to request assistance for a
66 recipient who is exhibiting extreme behavior, to provide
67 notice of an accident, or to report a crime, and when no one
68 is arrested, charged, or incarcerated.
69 (7) MAJOR INJURY. Any observable and substantial injury
70 that is not considered a moderate injury and that results in
71 permanent or protracted impairment, such as a serious
72 fracture, a major wound requiring sutures, injury to an
73 internal organ, a burn, or a physical disfigurement of the
74 body, which typically require medical treatment and may result
75 in hospitalization.
76 (8) MEDICATION ERROR. Occurs when a recipient receives
77 a wrong medicine, wrong dose, medication given at a wrong
78 time, medication administered by a wrong route, or when the
79 medication is not given for the right purpose or if there is a
80 documentation error.
81 (9) MISTREATMENT. Any act or threat of intimidation,
82 harassment, or similar deed to cause harm or create the fear
83 of harm to a recipient. The term includes the willful or
84 reckless infliction of emotional or mental anguish or the use
Page 3

reckless infliction of emotional or mental anguish or the use
HB497 INTRODUCED
85 of a physical or chemical restraint, medication, or isolation
86 as punishment or as a substitute for treatment or care of a
87 recipient. The term also includes, but is not limited to,
88 using physical or non-verbal gestures as a means of
89 intimidation, withholding of or the threat of withholding
90 physical necessities or personal possessions as a means of
91 intimidation for control of the recipient, or making false
92 statements as a means of confusing, frightening, or badgering
93 the recipient.
94 (10) MODERATE INJURY. Any observable and substantial
95 impairment of a recipient's physical health requiring medical
96 treatment that is not considered a major injury and that does
97 not cause a substantial risk of death, a permanent
98 disfigurement, or a protracted loss or impairment of the
99 function of a bodily member or organ. The term includes, but
100 is not limited to, superficial fractures and wounds requiring
101 sutures that do not result in permanent disfigurement.
102 (11) NEGLECT. The intentional or unintentional failure
103 of a provider to provide food, shelter, clothing, medical
104 services, supervision, or basic needs for safety for a
105 recipient who is unable to care for himself or herself. The
106 term includes self-neglect.
107 (12) PEER-TO-PEER PHYSICAL ASSAULT. A type of physical
108 abuse in which two or more recipients engage in intentional,
109 reckless, or aggressive behavior that results in a moderate or
110 major injury to another recipient.
111 (13) PEER-TO-PEER SEXUAL ASSAULT. A type of sexual
112 abuse wherein two or more recipients engage in unwanted or
Page 4

abuse wherein two or more recipients engage in unwanted or
HB497 INTRODUCED
113 non-consensual sexual contact or activity.
114 (14) PHYSICAL ABUSE. The intentional infliction of
115 physical pain, injury, or willful deprivation of services
116 necessary to maintain physical and mental health by a provider
117 or provider employee to a recipient. The term shall include,
118 but not be limited to, hitting, kicking, pinching, slapping,
119 or otherwise striking a recipient, and the use of excessive
120 force regardless of whether an injury results.
121 (15) PROVIDER. Any individual, agency, organization,
122 contractor, or group certified by ADMH to offer services for
123 individuals with developmental and intellectual disabilities
124 through ADMH Division of Developmental Disabilities.
125 (16) RECIPIENT. An individual with developmental or
126 intellectual disabilities who receives services from a
127 provider.
128 (17) RESTRICTIVE INTERVENTION. Any use of physical,
129 mechanical, or chemical restraints to immobilize or reduce the
130 ability of a recipient to move his or her arms, legs, body, or
131 head freely.
132 (18) RIGHTS VIOLATION. The unlawful interference,
133 denial, or infringement of a recipient's fundamental freedoms
134 and legal entitlements, including discrimination and
135 retaliation.
136 (19) SECLUSION. The involuntary confinement of a
137 recipient alone in a room or an area where the recipient is
138 physically prevented from leaving.
139 (20) SELF-NEGLECT. A type of neglect in which the
140 recipient fails to provide for his or her own basic needs when
Page 5

recipient fails to provide for his or her own basic needs when
HB497 INTRODUCED
141 the failure is the result of the recipient's mental or
142 physical inability, and the failure substantially endangers a
143 recipient's health, safety, welfare, or life.
144 (21) SERVICES. Supports provided for recipients living
145 with developmental and intellectual disabilities that are
146 designed to meet the needs of the recipient and are part of a
147 coordinated system of care.
148 (22) SEXUAL ABUSE. Any offense under Article 4, Chapter
149 6, Title 13A, Code of Alabama 1975, which is perpetrated by
150 anyone. The term includes, but is not limited to, unwanted or
151 non-consensual sexual contact or activity using force,
152 coercion or threats, rape, incest, sodomy, and indecent
153 exposure.
154 (23) SUICIDE ATTEMPT. An act committed by a recipient
155 in an attempt to cause his or her own death, limited to the
156 actual occurrence of an act. The term does not include verbal
157 suicidal threats by a recipient.
158 (24) UNEXPLAINED OR UNEXPECTED DEATH. The permanent
159 suspension of consciousness and the end of life due to an
160 unknown or unanticipated cause. At a minimum, unanticipated
161 causes include those that resulted from suicide, homicide or
162 other criminal activity, medical error or complications,
163 undiagnosed conditions or accidents, or those that were
164 suspicious for possible abuse or neglect.
165 (25) VERBAL ABUSE. The infliction of disparaging and
166 angry outbursts such as name calling, blaming, threatening, or
167 making derogatory comments that demean or could reasonably be
168 expected to cause shame, ridicule, humiliation, or emotional
Page 6

expected to cause shame, ridicule, humiliation, or emotional
HB497 INTRODUCED
169 distress.
170 (b) The ADMH Division of Developmental Disabilities
171 shall establish and maintain a Community Incident Prevention
172 and Management System (IPMS) that provides guidance for
173 providers for the implementation of an incident prevention and
174 management system to protect recipients from potential harm.
175 (c) The ADMH Division of Developmental Disabilities
176 shall design the IPMS to classify all of the following as
177 critical incidents:
178 (1) Mistreatment, including emotional and psychological
179 abuse.
180 (2) Physical and sexual abuse.
181 (3) Verbal Abuse.
182 (4) Peer-to-peer physical and sexual assault.
183 (5) Elopement.
184 (6) Unexplained or unexpected death.
185 (7) Exploitation.
186 (8) Major injury.
187 (9) Law enforcement involvement.
188 (10) Medication error resulting in consultation with
189 poison control, an emergency room visit, urgent care,
190 hospitalization, or death.
191 (11) Neglect.
192 (12) Rights violation.
193 (13) The misuse or unauthorized use of restrictive
194 intervention or seclusion.
195 (14) Suicide attempt.
196 (d) The ADMH Division of Developmental Disabilities
Page 7

(d) The ADMH Division of Developmental Disabilities
HB497 INTRODUCED
197 shall also design the IPMS to include the following provider
198 reporting requirements:
199 (1) Incident reports of critical incident types must be
200 reported to the ADMH Regional Office or another entity as
201 designated by ADMH within 24 hours of when the provider
202 becomes aware of the incident.
203 (2) All other incident types not included in subsection
204 (c) must be submitted at least quarterly to the electronic
205 incident management system as designated by ADMH.
206 (e) ADMH shall adopt rules and policies to implement
207 and administer this section, but may not require or adopt more
208 stringent reporting requirements for critical incidents than
209 the requirements provided for by this section, unless federal
210 law or regulations so require.
211 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
212 1, 2026.
Page 8